Hawaii statutes.
[§321-547] Severability. If any
provision in this part or the application thereof to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect the other provisions or
application of this part that can be given effect without the invalid provision
or application, and to this end the provisions of this part are severable. [L
2016, c 137, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next